Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or increased fees, adopted by the State Board of  Pharmacy and approved by
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) Remote Dispensing Site Pharmacy: $225
(2) Pharmacy Prescription Lockers: $120
(3) Pharmacy Prescription Kiosk: $120
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5546 (SB 5546-A) Page 1